Washington statutes.
RCW 36.160.800

Attacks prohibited.

No direct or collateral attack on any program purported to be authorized or created in conformance with this chapter may be commenced more than thirty days after creation.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 24 s 801.]

NOTES:

Construction—2015 3rd sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 36.160.030.